Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 12. Blockchain-Based Limited Liability Companies

§ 4171.
Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Blockchain technology” has the same meaning as in

12 V.S.A. § 1913

.

“Participant” means:

each person that has a partial or complete copy of the decentralized consensus ledger or database utilized by the blockchain technology, or otherwise participates in the validation processes of such ledger or database;

each person in control of any digital asset native to the blockchain technology; and

each person that makes a material contribution to the protocols.

“Protocols” means the designated regulatory model of the software that governs the rules, operations, and communication between nodes on the network utilized by the participants.

“Virtual currency” means a digital representation of value that:

is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store of value; and

is not legal tender, whether or not denominated in legal tender.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 4172.
Election.

A limited liability company organized pursuant to this title for the purpose of operating a business that utilizes blockchain technology for a material portion of its business activities may elect to be a blockchain-based limited liability company (BBLLC) by:

specifying in its articles of organization that it elects to be a BBLLC; and

meeting the requirements in subdivision 4173(2) and subsection 4174(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 4173.
Authority; requirements.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary:

A BBLLC may provide for its governance, in whole or in part, through blockchain technology.

The operating agreement for a BBLLC shall:

provide a summary description of the mission or purpose of the BBLLC;

specify whether the decentralized consensus ledger or database utilized or enabled by the BBLLC will be fully decentralized or partially decentralized and whether such ledger or database will be fully or partially public or private, including the extent of participants’ access to information and read and write permissions with respect to protocols;

adopt voting procedures, which may include smart contracts carried out on the blockchain technology, to address:

proposals from managers, members, or other groups of participants in the BBLLC for upgrades or modifications to software systems or protocols, or both;

other proposed changes to the BBLLC operating agreement; or

any other matter of governance or activities within the purpose of the BBLLC;

adopt protocols to respond to system security breaches or other unauthorized actions that affect the integrity of the blockchain technology utilized by the BBLLC;

provide how a person becomes a member of the BBLLC with an interest, which may be denominated in the form of units, shares of capital stock, or other forms of ownership or profit interests; and

specify the rights and obligations of each group of participants within the BBLLC, including which participants shall be entitled to the rights and obligations of members and managers.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 4174.
Multiple roles of members and managers.

A member or manager of a BBLLC may interact with the BBLLC in multiple roles, including as a member, manager, developer, node, miner, or other participant in the BBLLC, or as a trader and holder of the currency in its own account and for the account of others, provided such member or manager complies with any applicable fiduciary duties.

The activities of a member or manager who interacts with the BBLLC through multiple roles are not deemed to take place in this State solely because the BBLLC is organized in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 4175.
Consensus formation algorithms and governance processes.

In its governance, a BBLLC may:

adopt any reasonable algorithmic means for accomplishing the consensus process for validating records, as well as requirements, processes, and procedures for conducting operations, or making organizational decisions on the blockchain technology used by the BBLLC; and

in accordance with any procedure specified pursuant to section 4173 of this title, modify the consensus process, requirements, processes, and procedures, or substitute a new consensus process, requirements, processes, or procedures that comply with the requirements of law and the governance provisions of the BBLLC.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 4176.
Scope of subchapter; other law.

Except as expressly provided otherwise, this subchapter does not exempt a BBLLC from any other judicial, statutory, or regulatory provision of Vermont law or federal law, including State and federal securities laws. Except to the extent inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter, the provisions of the Vermont Limited Liability Company Act govern.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.